main text shortcuts
menu shortcuts
Free shipping over US$60
SAVE US$20 with OLIVE YOUNG APP !
PRIVACY POLICY
To protect your personal information, CJ Olive Young Corporation(hereafter, ‘Olive Young’) complies with any applicable law such as 「the Personal Information Protection Act (PIPA)」 and 「the Act on Promotion of Information and communications Network Utilization and Information Protection」, General Data Protection Regulation(GDPR) etc.
Olive Young strives to prevent the leakage and damage of your personal information.
Privacy Policy Table of Contents
Article 1 (Purpose of Collecting and Processing Personal Information)
Article 7 (Children's Privacy)
Article 13 (Personal Information Manager and Team)
Article 2 (Personal Information Olive Young Collects and Methods of Collection)
Article 8 (Additional Information for California Residents)
Article 14 (Matters on the operation of automatic collection devices and opt-out thereof)
Article 3 (Outsourcing of Personal Information Handling)
Article 9 (Additional Information for EEA residents)
Article 15 (Matters on Collection, Use, Provision and Rejection of Behavioral Information)
Article 4 (Sharing Personal Information with Third Parties)
Article 10 (How to Request Your rights)
Article 16 (Measures to Protect Personal Information)
Article 5 (Retention, Processing Period, and Disposal of Personal Information)
Article 11 (Notice of Financial Incentives)
Article 17 (Report and Consultation of Intrusion of Personal Information)
Article 6 (International Transfer of Personal Information)
Article 12 (Your Rights as a Registered User)
Article 18 (Notice and Changes to the Privacy Policy)
Article 1 (Purpose of Collecting and Processing Personal Information)
1. Olive Young collects only basic personal information necessary to provide its services, and seeks your consent when collecting additional information for services tailored to your tastes and interests.
If you are a registered user, not providing optional information will not restrict your use of services.
If you are not a registered user, you may refuse to give your consent, in which case you will not able to purchase items at Olive Young.
2. Olive Young does not collect any sensitive personal information such as your race or ethnicity, religion and philosophical beliefs, country of origin, political opinions, criminal record, medical information, and sexual orientation.
Purpose of Collecting and Processing Personal Information
Classification
Purposes
Details
Required
Customer management
- To confirm your consent on registration
- To fulfill legal obligations, suspend services to those who violate the terms and conditions and applicable laws, and restrict malicious use
- To give notifications and to confirm communication channel to deal with customer service
- To confirm your request for account registration and withdrawal, and to manage, maintain, fulfill, and settle contracts
- To provide services to registered customers
Contract fulfilment and billing for your use of services
- To acquire accurate transaction information for billing and shipping
- To deal with your complaints on services
- To operate the customer service center and enable you to redeem and accumulate reward points
- To provide refunds and collect payment information for your purchases of goods or services
Optional
Marketing activities and development of new services
- To provide personalized services, convenience, and benefits
- To notify you of upcoming events, special offers, etc.
- To analyze your use of services and marketing trends (individual and group statistics), and develop new services
- To conduct marketing activities for Olive Young and its affiliates
- To send periodical newsletters
- To promote services and products offered by Olive Young or its affiliates
- To provide information on promotions and opportunities for participation of event(via e-mail, social media account, etc,), send URLs for app installation, etc.
Use of other services
- To participate in events on the Olive Young website and on social media
Other
Information collected/generated during use of services or business processing
- To analyze your interests and patterns of use for marketing campaigns, and conduct statistical analysis and research to develop services
- To prepare for intrusion of personal information and preserve records for customer dispute resolution
- To proceed with payment for your purchase
- To prevent fraudulent, participate event
- For user analysis of services and products
Article 2 (Personal Information Olive Young Collects and Methods of Collection)
Olive Young collects the following personal information.
1. Personal Information Items Processed without the Data Subject’s Consent
2. Personal Information Items Processed with the Data Subject’s Consent
Personal Information Olive Young Collects and Methods of Collection
Classification
Methods
Collected/Processed Information
Retention and Usage Period
Required
When you register
(at Olive Young online)
Password, E-mail Address, Age Group, Name
Upon Withdrawal of Membership or Consent
When you register
(through in-store events)
Password, E-mail Address, Age Group, Name, Country
Upon Withdrawal of Membership or Consent
Sign-up Registering through social accounts (Google)
Email ID, name, language preference,
Upon Withdrawal of Membership or Consent
Sign-up Registering through social accounts (Apple)
Email ID, name
Upon Withdrawal of Membership or Consent
When you purchase an item at Olive Young online
- Shipping Information: Name, Contact No., Address, E-mail Address, Collection of personal customs clearance number (ID Number) or passport number required for shipping to specific countries
- Payment Information
1) When you pay by credit card: IP Address, Payment Information such as Credit Card No.
2) When you pay via a payment gateway: IP Address, Payment Information such as Credit Card No.
5 years (Article 6 of the E-Commerce Act)
However, for regular members, until withdrawal
When you purchase as a guest
- Shipping Information: Name, Contact No., Address, E-mail Address, Guest Password, Collection of personal customs clearance number (ID Number) or passport number required for shipping to specific countries
- Payment Information
1) When you pay by credit card: IP Address, Payment Information such as Credit Card No.
2) When you pay via a payment gateway: IP Address, Payment Information such as Credit Card No.
5 years (Article 6 of the E-Commerce Act)
Optional
When you agree to the use of your information for marketing activities
Date of Birth, Gender, Referrer email address
Upon Withdrawal of Membership or Consent
When you submit a beauty profile
Skin Tone, Skin Type, Skin Concern, Hair Color, Hair Type, Hair Concern, Eye Color
Upon Withdrawal of Membership or Consent
Participate in Event(ex, Beauty Tester)
Name, Contact No., Address, E-mail Address
3 months
When you participate in an event on the SNS of Olive Young
SNS ID, SNS nickname, SNS profile image, Address, Contact No.
90 days after prize delivery
[For Olive Young members] When you agree to receive shopping or event information
- When you agree to receive shopping or event information via E-mail Address: E-mail Address
- When you agree to receive shopping or event information via APP PUSH: PUSH token
Upon Withdrawal of Membership or Consent
[For guest] When you agree to receive newsletter
Email address, newsletter reception/opening record
Upon consent withdrawal
When you agree to join OLIVE YOUNG Affiliate, Reward(Cash Out), participate Affiliate Exclusive event.
- Join : SNS ID that you selected, Country of your activity, Categories that you are interested in
- Reward : PayPal ID
- event : Name, Contact No., Address, E-mail Address
5 years (Article 6 of the E-Commerce Act)
However, for regular members, until withdrawal
(* Olive Young seeks your consent for optional information collected when you participate in an event, make an inquiry, and use specific services.)
3. Automatically Generated Information during Service Use
Personal Information Olive Young Collects and Methods of Collection
Classification
Methods
Collected/Processed Information
Retention and Usage Period
Other
Information collected/generated during use of services or business processing
- Service Usage History (Usage Time and Purchase History of Items and Services)
- History of Payment/Account Suspension/Visits, IP Address, Cookies
- Device Information (Type, OS Version Number, Model No,Device identification information)
Upon Withdrawal of Membership or Consent or Statutory mandatory storage period (3 months)
Article 3 (Outsourcing of Personal Information Handling)
Olive Young outsources certain services to the following companies. In accordance with applicable laws, essential terms and conditions are stipulated in contract with the entrusted companies to safeguard your personal information
Outsourcing of Personal Information Handling
Company Name (Service Provider)
Entrusted Services
KCP
(Reconsignment : DHL, Yongin Post Office, QXPRESS INC, On.U)
Collecting Shipping Information and Shipping Purchased Products & Give aways for Events, Export declaration agency service
Transcosmos Korea
Customer Service Operation & Customer Consultation
KR Partners
Payment Processing
KSNET
Payment Processing
CJ OLIVE NETWORKS, 3TOP
Building up and operating IT system
Article 4 (Sharing Personal Information with Third Parties)
1. Olive Young processes your personal information only for the reasons specified on ‘Purpose of Collecting and Processing Personal Information’ and does not use the information or share with third parties for any other purpose.
Sharing Personal Information with Third Parties
Company Name
(Service Provider)
Purpose
Sharing Information
Sharing Period
Paypal
Application of Seller
Protection Policy by
Paypal
- Name(First name, Last name)
- Detail Address, City, State/Province, Zip/Postal Code, Country,
Purpose of Collecting and
Processing Personal
Information is fulfilled
2. However, your personal information can be shared for the following reasons.
1) When you give your consent.
2) Compliance with legal provisions or statutory obligations
3) Performance of duties under the jurisdiction of public institutions
4) Urgent interests in life, body, or property
5) Achievement of legitimate interests of the personal information processor
6) Urgent need for public health, public safety, and well-being
Article 5 (Retention, Processing Period, and Disposal of Personal Information)
1. Once the purpose of collection is fulfilled, your personal information is immediately disposed of by Olive Young. However, if longer retention is required by any applicable law or you agree to extended retention and processing period of your information, the data is securely stored and used only for the intended purposes.
1) If longer retention and processing period are required by applicable laws (not limited to followings).
- Record of Contracts and Subscription Withdrawal: 5 Years
- Record of Payment and Provision of Goods: 5 Years
- Record of Customer Complaint and Dispute Resolution: 3 Years
- Date and Time of Visit: 3 Months (Excluding the date and time of your last visit to confirm the period of service)
2) To minimize any loss or damages from repetitious account withdrawal and re-registration and to enable you to reactivate your account as required, your data will be destroyed immediately after your account is withdrawn.
3) Valid commercial credit (such as reward points) is retained until it expires.
2. Your information is disposed of or deleted by the following methods depending on its form.
1) Personal information stored on paper is shredded or incinerated.
2) Electronically stored personal information is securely disposed of and is not retrievable.
Article 6 (International Transfer of Personal Information)
To provide smooth service, Olive Young entrusts the processing of personal information overseas as follows.
1. Legal Basis: Article 28-8, Paragraph 1, Subparagraph 3 of the Personal Information Protection Act (Entrusted Processing/Storage for Contract Performance)
International Transfer of Personal Information
Recipient/
Contact Information
Sharing
information
Relocated
countries
Date and method of
transfer
Purpose
Sharing Period
Methods of the Refusal of Cross-Border Transfer
Datadog
(
help@datadoghq.com
)
Encrypted member number, visit date/time, service usage record
USA
Transmission through the network at the time of service use
- Schedule: Immediately upon transmission of logs from the Agent to the Datadog SaaS
- Method: API communication
Statistical analysis of service use
Up to 15 days from the date of information collection
If you refuse cross-border transfer, you may be unable to use the OLIVE YOUNG services.
If you do not wish to proceed with the transfer, you may proceed with membership or terms withdrawal or request suspension of personal information processing through oycs.global@cj.net.
Google Analytics
(
https://support.google.com/analytics/gethelp
)
Encrypted membership number, user's web/app service visit, search, and inquiry history
USA
Transmission through the network at the time of service use
Statistical analysis of service use
Until Membership Withdrawal
If you wish to refuse the cross-border transfer of personal information, you may do so according to the methods outlined in Articles 14 of the Personal Information Processing Policy, provided, however, that in such case your use of the Olive Young services that necessarily involve the cross-border transfer of personal information may be restricted.
Braze Inc
Name, encrypted member number, email, gender, age group, date of birth, country, service usage data (viewed pages, time spent, click events)
USA
Transmission through the network at the time of service use
To collect customer activity information, analyze service usage and behavior, compile statistics, manage CRM, provide personalized recommendations, and send messages
Until 30 days after membership withdrawal or termination of the service contract
If you refuse cross-border transfer, you may be unable to use the OLIVE YOUNG services. If you do not wish to proceed with the transfer, you may proceed with membership or terms withdrawal or request suspension of personal information processing through oycs.global@cj.net.
Amazon Web Services Inc.
(
https://aws.amazon.com/compliance/contact
)
All personal information collected or generated from users
USA
Transmission through the network at the time of service use
Operation and management of databases and servers where personal information is stored during the retention period
Upon Withdrawal of Membership or Consent
If you refuse cross-border transfer, you may be unable to use the OLIVE YOUNG services.
If you do not wish to proceed with the transfer, you may proceed with membership or terms withdrawal or request suspension of personal information processing through oycs.global@cj.net.
Amplitude
(privacy@amplitude.com)
Encrypted member number, gender, date of birth, ADID/IDFA, service usage data( visit date/time, viewed pages, time spent, click events)
USA
Transmission through the network at the time of service use
To collect customer activity information, analyze service usage and behavior, compile statistics
Until 30 days after membership withdrawal or termination of the service contract
If you refuse cross-border transfer, you maybe unable to use the OLIVE YOUNG services. If you do not wish to proceed with the transfer, you may proceed with membership or terms withdrawal or request suspension of personal information processing through oycs.global@cj.net.
Article 7 (Children's Privacy)
Our website is not intended for or directed to children under the age of 13. We do not knowingly collect personal information directly from children under the age of 13 without parental consent. If we become aware that a child under the age of 13 has provided us with personal information, we will delete the information from our records.
Article 8 (Additional Information for California Residents)
Based on CCPA, The California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 or “CPRA” (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.100 et seq.) has strengthened regulations on business operators by expanding consumer’s right to privacy to be closer to the European Union’s GDPR.
If you reside in California, this section applies to you and describes our data practices today and in the preceding 12 months.
1. Categories of Personal Data
We collect the following categories of personal data: identifiers (such as your name, email, or IP address); commercial information (such as records of products you purchased); characteristics of protected classifications under California or U.S. federal law (such as your age or gender); internet or electronic network activity (such as information about your activity on our website); geolocation data (such as your city of residence); audio, electronic, visual, or similar information (such as phone recordings when you call our customer service channels); and inferences drawn from your personal data to create a profile (such as your shopping preferences). For examples of the precise data points we collect and the sources of such collection, please see the Information We Collect section above. We use personal data for the business or commercial purposes described in the Use of Information section above. We disclose personal data for the business purposes described in the Disclosure of Information section above. Additionally, in the preceding 12 months, we have disclosed the following categories of personal data for business purposes to the following categories of recipients:
Categories of Personal Data
Category of Personal Data
Categories of Recipients
Identifiers
Partners that provide advertising and marketing services, data analytics providers, payment processors, fulfillment partners, customer support partners, Internet service providers, operating systems and platforms, other users, cloud service providers, technical maintenance and system security providers
Commercial Information
Data analytics providers, partners that provide advertising and marketing services, payment processors, fulfillment partners, customer support partners, fraud prevention partners, and cloud service providers
Characteristics of Protected Classifications under California or U.S. federal law
Partners that provide advertising and marketing services, other users, and customer feedback platforms
Internet or other electronic network activity information
Partners that provide advertising and marketing services, data analytics providers, Internet service providers, operating systems and platforms, cloud service providers, and technical maintenance and system security providers
Geolocation data
Partners that provide advertising and marketing services, data analytics providers, Internet service providers, and operating systems and platforms
2. Your Privacy Rights
1) Right to Know(Access) about Personal Information Collected and Disclosed
You have the right to request that we disclose certain information to you about our collection, use, and disclosure your Personal Information.
2) Right to Request Correction of Inaccurate Personal Information
You have the right to request we correct any inaccuracies of your Personal Information we maintain about you. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable Consumer request, we will correct (and direct our Services Providers and/or Third Parties to correct) the Personal Information we maintain about you.
3) Right to Request Deletion of Personal Information
You have the right to request that we delete the Personal Information that we have collected and retained about you. Once we receive and confirm your Consumer request, we will delete (and direct our Services Providers and/or Third Parties to correct) your Personal Information from our records, unless an exception applies.
4) Right to Opt-Out of the Sharing of Personal Information
The CPRA defines "sell" as the disclosure of Personal Information to a Third Party for monetary or other valuable consideration. The CPRA defines "share" as the disclosure of Personal Information to a Third Party for cross-context behavioral advertising.
We do not sell Personal Information and will not sell Personal Information without providing you with prior notice and an opportunity to opt-out, as required by law.
We use services that provide interest-based advertising to you, and our websites and applications use cookies or similar technologies to share personal information, including information about your behavior, with our advertising partners to do so. Olive Young only allows our advertising partners to collect your personal information in this way with your consent.
5) Right to Request Non-discrimination
You have the right not to receive discriminatory treatment for exercising any of your rights.
Article 9 (Additional Information for EEA residents)
Pursuant to the General Data Protection Regulation or “GDPR”, if you are a resident of the European Economic Area (“EEA”), this section applies to you and we process your Personal Information under the following lawful bases:
• Your consent
• The performance of the contract between you and the Site
• Compliance with our legal obligations
• To protect your vital interests
• To perform a task carried out in the public interest
• For our legitimate interests, which do not override your fundamental rights and freedoms
Where we have collected and processed your personal information with your consent, you may withdraw your consent at any time.
1. Your Privacy Rights
1) Right to Access your Personal Information
You have the right to access to your personal data so that you can verify the processing of your personal data and its lawfulness.
2) Right to Request Data Portability
You have the right to request a copy of your Personal Information in electronic form and to transfer that use on a third party’s services.
3) Right to Request Correction of Inaccurate Personal Information
You have the right to request we correct any inaccuracies of your Personal Information we maintain about you. Once we receive and confirm your verifiable Consumer request, we will correct (and direct our Services Providers and/or Third Parties to correct) the Personal Information we maintain about you.
4) Right to Request Erased of Personal Information
You have the right to demand that the Data Controller erase the Personal Data relating to you without delay.
We shall delete personal information in the event of the achievement of the purpose of personal information processing, withdrawal of consent by the information subject, etc.
5) Right to Request Restriction of Data Processing
You have the right to restrict the processing of personal information about you if any of the following applies to you. If you request a restriction on data processing, the controller can only keep your data.
• You have challenged the accuracy of the personal data
• If the processing is unlawful and you request the restriction of processing of your personal data instead of objecting to erasure.
• We no longer need the Personal Data, but you need the Personal Data for the exercise or defense of legal claims.
• Until we determine whether the legitimate interests of the controller are overridden by the legitimate interests of the data subject.
6) Right to Object to Processing of Personal Data(including automated decision-making)
You have the right to object at any time to the processing of your personal data, including automated decision-making (including profiling), and also include processing for marketing.
Article 10 (How to Request Your rights)
1. You may exercise your rights by:
• Email us : Team, Digital Global Business Team l
oycs.global@cj.net
Please note that we need to verify your identity based on your email and name before we can process your CPRA and GDPR related request. We will send you a confirmation of your identity via the email address you provide in the form below, so please include the email address you actually use (we do not accept requests for representation).
If you are a verifiable California resident, you may only request your rights twice within a 12-month period.
Registered user can raise a complaint to the supervisory authority about the processing personal information of Olive Young.
► Download "Request Your rights" (CPRA)
► Download "Request Your rights" (GDPR)
Please do not include any Personal or Sensitive information beyond what is requested in the email or associated form.
You generally have the option of interacting with us anonymously or using a pseudonym under Australian law, or a court or tribunal order, however in some instances this may prevent us from being able to provide you with products and services, for an example where you place an order for products online.
2. Registered customers can always correct and delete their information.
1) Personal Information Inquiry and Revision
- To Inquiry and Revision your Personal Information : My Account > My Profile > Edit My Profile
2) You can always Consent or Withdraw Optional Consent
- To Consent or Withdraw your Optional Consent : My Account > My Profile
3) You can always Close your Account
- To Close your Account : Account > Edit My profile > Close Account or My Account > Deactivate Account > Close Account
- When you close your account, Olive Young will immediately take any necessary action such as prompt disposal of personal information.
3. Responses to your rights requests and reply statistics
Under the CPRA, Olive Young is required to annually disclose its processing of personal information for the preceding 12 months. Olive Young provides these reports once a year based on the previous 12 months.
Currently, there have been no guarantee claims submitted to OLIVE YOUNG Global.
* As a request under the GDPR only.
** Requests that cannot be validated due to failed identity verification or that cannot be processed under applicable law. These requests are not included in the totals above.
Article 11 (Notice of Financial Incentives)
We offer various financial incentives. For example, we may provide discounts or other benefits to customers who sign up to receive our marketing emails. When you participate in a financial incentive, we collect personal data from you, such as identifiers like your name and email address. You can opt in to a financial incentive by following the sign-up instructions, and you have the ability to opt out of the program by contacting us at
oycs.global@cj.net
. In some cases, we may provide additional terms and conditions for a financial incentive, which we will provide to you when you sign up. The value of your personal data is reasonably related to the value of the offer or discount presented to you.
Article 12 (Your Rights as a Registered User)
1. Registered customers can always view, revise, and request their personal information.
1) Personal Information Inquiry and Revision
Personal Information Inquiry and Revision
Team: Digital Global Business Team
Inquiry: Customer Service Center
Via e-mail
Via Olive Young online
oycs.global@cj.net
+82)2-6970-8666
- Contact No., E-mail Address, Password: My Account > My Profile > Edit My Profile
- Contact the customer service center or specified team above.
2) information which you can request Olive Young to provide.
- your personal information which Olive Young retains.
- status of your consents for collecting, processing and sharing your personal information.
- status of sharing your personal information with service provider and third parties
3) When you make a request to correct erroneous information on your profile, the relevant personal information will not be used or provided until corrections are applied. In case incorrect information is provided to third parties, Olive Young will immediately notify them of the correct information and instruct them to apply to their services.
4) If you are a registered user, you may request Olive Young to provide or get access to your personal information, in which case Olive Young will reply your request within 10 days.
2. You can always withdraw your consent to the Privacy Policy on collecting, processing, and sharing your personal information.
When you close your account, Olive Young will immediately take any necessary action such as prompt disposal of personal information.
- To close your account: Account > Edit My profile > Close Account or My Account > Deactivate Account > Close Account
3. Notwithstanding Articles 1 and 2 above, requests to view or correct your personal information cmay be restricted for the following reasons.
1) In case of threats to the life, rights, interests, or assets of you or a third party
2) In case of significant disruptions to the service providers
3) In case of breaches of applicable laws
4. Olive Young restricts membership and its service for children under 16 years of age.
5. Registered user can raise a complaint to the EU supervisory authority about the processing personal information of Olive Young
Article 13 (Personal Information Manager and Team)
To protect your personal information and deal with any relevant issues, Olive Young has designated an officer in order to protect your personal information. Feel free to contact us with any inquiries regarding personal information. The officer will immediately and sincerely reply to your inquiries. For inquiries other than personal information, please contact
oycs.global@cj.net
Personal Information Manager and Team
Position
Name
E-mail Address
CPO
Ahyoung Yoo
oycs.global@cj.net
DPO
Representative
Justyna Rulewicz
privacy_eu@cj.net
Article 14 (Matters on the operation of automatic collection devices and opt-out thereof)
1. Automatic Cookie collection
Olive Young uses collected ‘cookies’ to provide a more personalized experience on the website.
Cookies are small text files sent to your browser by the web server you visit and stored in the hard disk of your device (such as your desktop, smartphone, tablet PC, etc.) when you use services on Olive Young’s website or mobile app. Cookies identify the device you are using but not you as an individual. Cookies expire when you close the browser or sign out.
The data collected by cookies can be used for the following purposes:
1) To analyze the frequency and time of your visits, figure out your interests and patterns of use, and target your visits and events you participate in
2) To track your most viewed items and provide services tailored to your interests for a more personalized experience on the website
3) To analyze customer behavior for service improvement initiatives
You have a right to accept or disable cookies. You can accept all cookies, choose to be notified every time a cookie is issued, or disable all cookies.
Block/allow personalized ads via web browser
1) Internet Explorer (Internet Explorer 11 for Windows 10)
- In Internet Explorer, select the Tools button, then select Internet Options
- Select the Privacy tab, select Advanced under Settings, then Block or Allow Cookies
2) Microsoft Edge
- In Edge, click the "…" mark in the upper right corner, then click Settings.
- After clicking "Privacy, Search and Services" on the left side of the settings page, select whether to prevent tracking and the level in the [Tracking Prevention] section.
- Choose whether to “Always use ‘Strict’ Tracking Protection when browsing InPrivate.”
- In the [Privacy] section below, choose whether to “Send a ‘do not track’ request.”
3) Chrome
- In Chrome, click the top right "⋮" mark (Customize and control Chrome), then click the Settings.
- Click “Show advanced settings” at the bottom of the Settings page and click Content Settings in the [Privacy] section.
- In the Cookies section, check the box for “Block third-party cookies and site data.”
[Refusal Method]
- iOS: Home > Settings > Privacy > Tracking > Allow Apps to Request to Track (OFF)
- Android: Home > Settings > Google > Ads > Delete Advertising ID
※ The menu and methods are contingent upon the version of the mobile operating system.
2. Weblogs analytics using Google Analytics
CJ Olive Young Corporation uses Google Analytics, a weblog analysis tool provided by Google, Inc. (“Google”). Weblog analysis refers to the analysis of the customer’s use of website services. Google processes the information on behalf of CJ Olive Young Corporation and analyzes your website usage. CJ Olive Young Corporation does not process any personally identifiable information in this process. If you do not want Google to process your data, you can opt out of this by downloading and installing add-ons for your web browser at tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout.
[How to opt out]
- For Chrome: Click [Download Browser Add-on to block Google Analytics] > Click [Add to Chrome] > When pop-up window is displayed, click [Add Extension] > Click Done.
- For IE (Internet Explorer): Click [Download Browser Add-on to block Google Analytics] > Click [Agree and Install] > Click [Run] or [Save] on the window displayed at the bottom > Click [Restart Later] or [Restart Now], as the changed setting will only be applied after restarting the browser > Upon clicking [Restart Now], the pop-up on how to use the add-on will appear. Then, click [Use] > Done.
For more information on Google Analytics’ processing of information, please visit support.google.com/analytics/answer/6004245
If you want to stop log analysis through an external analysis tool, you can cancel the setting through the guidance page below.
https://support.google.com/analytics/answer/181881?hl=en
Article 15 (Matters on Collection, Use, Provision and Rejection of Behavioral Information)
1. CJ OLIVE YOUNG collects and uses behavioral information in order to provide customized services and benefits optimized to information subjects, online customized advertisements, etc. during the service use process.
2. CJ OLIVE YOUNG collects behavioral information as follows.
Legal Basis: Article 15, Paragraph 1, Subparagraph 4 of the Personal Information Protection Act (Contract Performance)
CJ OLIVE YOUNG collects behavioral information
Items of collected behavioral information
How to collect behavioral information
Purpose of collecting behavioral information
Retention/use period and subsequent information processing method
Number of views on Join, Product Info, Shopping Bag, Place Order, and Purchase Completion pages
Automatic collection and transmission when using user website/app service
Collect customer activity information and provide customized recommendations
Destroy after storage until membership withdrawal
3. CJ OLIVE YOUNG allows online customized advertisement operators to collect and process behavioral information as follows.
- Advertisers who wish to collect and process behavioral information: Google Ads, Facebook, Twitter, Snapchat, TikTok, Amazon Ads
- How to collect behavioral information: Automatic collection and transmission when users visit our website or run our apps
- Items of behavioral information collected and processed: User's web/app visit history, search history, purchase history
- Retention/use period: Until membership withdrawal and consignment contract termination
If you wish to opt-in or opt-out, you can adjust your preferences by accessing the cookie settings link below:
• Google Ads :
https://support.google.com/adsense/answer/142293?hl=en
• Facebook :
https://www.facebook.com/settings/?tab=ads
• Twitter :
https://help.twitter.com/en/safety-and-security/privacy-controls-for-tailored-ads
• Snapchat :
https://values.snap.com/privacy/privacy-policy
• TikTok :
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/privacy-policy
• Amazon Ads :
https://advertising.amazon.com/legal/privacy-notice
4. The information subject can inquire about behavioral information, exercise the right to refuse, and complaints of damage through the contact information below.
The information subject can inquire about behavioral information, exercise the right to refuse, and complaints of damage through the contact information below.
Privacy Officer (CPO/DPO): Yoo Ah Young
Contact: CJ OLIVE YOUNG Customer Service Center
Article 16 (Measures to Protect Personal Information)
Olive Young establishes the following technical/organizational measures to ensure the security of your personal information and prevent the loss, leakage, theft, and damage of your personal information due to cyberattack.
1. Technical Measures
- Your personal information is protected by your password. Important personal data and your password are encrypted before storage.
- To prevent any damage from computer viruses and intrusion of personal information, vaccine programs are employed and updated on a regular basis.
- Encryption algorithms are used to safely transfer your personal data over networks.
- To prevent the leakage of your personal information due to cyberattack and to detect illegal intrusion, vulnerability assessments are conducted on a regular basis and intrusion detection systems are installed.
2. Organizational Measures
- The number of individuals who deal with personal information is limited to a minimum extent and periodic trainings are provided to the relevant employees.
- The authority to access personal data is provided in accordance to the procedures of the personal information processing system and is periodically examined and withdrawn if needed.
- Internal procedures are established to conduct inspections on compliance with the Privacy Policy.
- Olive Young manages and supervises the entrusted companies that process your personal data.
Article 17 (Report and Consultation of Intrusion of Personal Information)
You may be assisted by the following organizations in case you need to consult or report any violation of use of personal information.
Report and Consultation of Intrusion of Personal Information
KISA
Personal Information Dispute Mediation Committee
Cyber Crime Investigation, Supreme Prosecutors’ Office
National Police Agency Cyber Bureau
(+82) 118
privacy.kisa.or.kr
1833-6972
www.kopico.go.kr
(+82) 1301
www.spo.go.kr
(+82) 182
ecrm.cyber.go.kr
Article 18 (Notice and Changes to the Privacy Policy)
The privacy policy stated above may be revised in compliance with government policies, applicable laws, and due to the security system update., and we will put out a notification online of all changes such as the addition, removal, or amendment of privacy policy with the reasons
(Privacy Policy v.3.7 Published on Feburary 27th, 2025)
Implementation Privacy Policy: Feburary 27th, 2025
Privacy Policy (v3.6): Published on Jan 9th, 2025
Privacy Policy (v3.5): Published on Dec 20th, 2024
Privacy Policy (v3.4): Published on Oct 24th, 2024
Privacy Policy (v3.3): Published on Jul 17th, 2024
Privacy Policy (v3.2): Published on Jun 28th, 2024
Privacy Policy (v3.1): Published on Apr 1st, 2024
Privacy Policy (v3.0): Published on Dec 7th, 2023
Privacy Policy (v2.9): Published on Aug 25th, 2023
Privacy Policy (v2.8): Published on Oct 28th, 2022
Privacy Policy (v2.7): Published on Dec 30th, 2021
Privacy Policy (v2.6): Published on Dec 30th, 2021
Privacy Policy (v2.5): Published on Nov 18th, 2021
Privacy Policy (v2.4): Published on Sep 16th, 2021
Privacy Policy (v2.3): Published on Apr 29th, 2021
Privacy Policy (v2.2): Published on Jan 15th, 2021
Privacy Policy (v2.1): Published on Jun 1st, 2020
Privacy Policy (v2.0): Published on Apr 1st, 2020
Privacy Policy (v1.1): Published on Feb 27th, 2020
Privacy Policy (v1.0): Published on Jun 10th, 2019
Add to
Wish List
Add to
Wish List
Add to
bag
Notice
Our hotline system is designed to help both our employees and outside stakeholders report any wrongdoing in the most trustworthy manner.
If you want to talk to customer service center, please click the button below.
HOT LINE (For employees and outside stakeholders)
Terms and Conditions
We use cookies to deliver the best experience. By using our site, you agree to our cookie policy.
facebook
tweeter
Copy
sns share
TOP
Free shipping over US$60
SAVE US$20 with OLIVE YOUNG APP !
Categories
Search
Home
My
History
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://help.twitter.com/en/safety-and-security/privacy-controls-for-tailored-ads:
Skip to main content
Help Center
Using X
Managing your account
Safety and security
Rules and policies
Resources
New user FAQ
Glossary
A safer X
Accessibility
Our rules
My privacy
How we address misinformation on X
Recommender Systems
Sign in
Contact Us
Help Center
Your privacy controls for personalized ads
Help Center
Your privacy controls for personalized ads
About personalized ads
We work with ads partners to bring you more useful and interesting advertising content through interest-based advertising. For example, we may do this based on information that ad partners share with us. We hope that this increases the usefulness of X Ads for you.
Here’s one way it would work. Let’s say a flower shop wants to advertise a Valentine’s Day special on X. They’d prefer to show their ad to floral enthusiasts who subscribe to their newsletter. To get the special offer to those people who are using X, the shop may share with us hashed emails from their mailing list. We can then match that to a hash of emails that our users have associated with their accounts in order to show them a Promoted post for the Valentine’s Day deal on X.
Another way this works is when a person visits the flower shop’s website. In that case, depending on technologies implemented by the shop’s website, X may collect information through pixels and similar technologies that enable the shop owner to advertise through X and reach those visitors with a Valentine’s Day offer. For more information about pixels and similar technologies we use, see our
Cookie Policy
.
About X marketing
In addition to helping advertisers to reach their audiences on X, X also works with third-party advertising partners, including Google, to market X’s own services, including through the delivery of interest-based ads. These partners may also serve ads on behalf of X advertisers. The privacy options described below apply to interest-based ads served by X; they do not apply to ads served by these other companies, including on X’s behalf. You can learn more about opting out of receiving interest-based ads from other companies at
optout.aboutads.info
and
www.networkadvertising.org/choices
. If you are on the web, you can also opt out of Google Analytics by installing Google’s
opt-out browser add-on
, and opt out of interest-based Google ads using
Google’s Ads Settings
.
What are my privacy options?
If you don't want X to combine your activity on X with other online activity from our partners to show you interest-based ads on and off of X, there are several ways to turn off this feature:
Using your X settings, visit the
Ads preferences
settings and disable the
Personalized ads
setting.
If you are on the web, you can visit the Digital Advertising Alliance’s consumer choice tool at
optout.aboutads.info
to opt out of seeing interest-based advertising from X in your current browser.
On iOS 13 and previous versions only, if you do not want X to show you interest-based ads in X for iOS on your current mobile device, enable the “Limit Ad Tracking” setting in your iOS phone’s settings (precise directions may be different on different iOS versions). On iOS 14 and later versions only, if you don't want X to access your iOS Identifier for Advertising, disable the “Allow Apps to Request to Track” setting in your iOS settings (precise directions may be different on different iOS versions). If you do not want X to show you interest-based ads in X for Android on your current mobile device, enable “Opt out of Ads Personalization” in your Android phone’s settings.
Note:
Please confirm that you are logged in if you want to view or change the web settings for your X account. Changing your X settings in your web browser when you are logged out will only affect behavior on that browser while you are not logged in to X.
Opting out of X’s interest-based ads won’t stop you from seeing X ads altogether. For example, you may still see ads on X that are personalized based on other information, including what you post, who you follow, what type of phone you use, where you are, and the links you click on X.
Share this article
Post
Did someone say … cookies?
X and its partners use cookies to provide you with a better, safer and
  faster service and to support our business. Some cookies are necessary to use
  our services, improve our services, and make sure they work properly.
Show more about your choices
.
Accept all cookies
Refuse non-essential cookies
Sub-policy 1
https://values.snap.com/privacy/privacy-policy:
Privacy
Privacy
Privacy Center
Privacy Principles
Privacy by Product
Privacy Policy
Teens on Snapchat
Snap and Ads
Privacy Through Security
We've updated our Privacy Policy, effective April 7, 2025. You can view the prior Privacy Policy, which applies to all users until April 7, 2025,
here
.
Privacy Policy
Effective: April 7, 2025
Welcome to
Snap Inc.
’s Privacy Policy. This Policy explains how we collect and use your data and how you can control your information. Looking for a quick summary on our privacy practices? Check out this
page
or this
video
. If you’re looking for specific product privacy information, for example, how we process your Chats and Snaps, take a look at our
Privacy by Product
page. In addition to these documents, we also show in-app notices that provide you more information about our products and services. And if you’re a Spectacles user you can learn more on how we collect and use your data in the
Spectacles Supplemental Privacy Policy
.
Transparency is one of our core values at Snap. We believe there shouldn’t be any surprises about the data we collect and how we use it — that’s why we’re upfront with how we process it. For example, we process your information to provide you a more personalized experience, including to show you content and information that is most relevant to your experience, as well as more relevant advertisements. Understanding your interests and preferences help us provide a better product experience.
Furthermore, we believe a personalized experience should not come at the expense of your privacy. Just like in real life, there are some moments you want to share privately with your close friends, and others that you want to share publicly. That’s why from day one our philosophy has been to delete content by default and to give Snapchatters control by providing the tools that allow them to decide what happens with their content, like who to share it with or when to save it.
This Policy covers our Snapchat app as well as our other products, services, and features, such as Bitmoji, Spectacles, and our advertising and commerce initiatives. When you read "Services" in this Policy, we’re talking about all of them. Also, if you see us refer to our "Terms," we mean the
Terms of Service
that you agree to when you sign up for our Services. Finally, if you see the term "Snapchatter" we are often using that as shorthand for any user of our Services.
Let’s get started with the controls you have over your information:
Control Over Your Information
Control over your information and settings is a core part of Snapchat experience. You can access, update, and delete your information, decide who can contact you, and download your data from within the Snapchat app. Below, we give you more details on the types of settings that are available, link out to our data download tool, and provide instructions on how to delete data or your account.
We want you to be in control of your information, so we provide you with a range of tools, including:
Access and update your information.
You can access and edit most of your basic account information right in our Services. Just navigate to your settings and you will see the options available to you.
Delete your information.
If you want to delete your account, learn how
here
. You can also delete some information within our Services, like content you’ve saved to Memories, content you’ve shared with My AI, Spotlight submissions, and more.
Control who can see your content.
We’ve built a number of tools that let you choose who you share your content with. In some cases you may want to share content with your friends, and in other instances you may want to share it with the public. To learn more, go
here
.
Control who can contact you.
Snapchat is intended for close friends and family, that’s why we’ve built controls that help you decide who can contact you. If you receive unwanted communications, you can always
block
and
report
that person. Go
here
to learn more.
Change your permissions.
In most cases, you can change your permissions at any time. For example,  by default you are findable to others through your phone number and/or email address that you provided. If you no longer want to be findable, you can always change your settings. Or if you provided access to your phone or third party platform contacts to make friending easier, you can change that later on in your app settings. Of course, if you do that, certain features and Services, like finding friends in your contact book, won’t work.
Opt out of promotional messages.
You have the option to opt out or unsubscribe from promotional emails and messages sent by SMS or other messaging platforms. To do so, just follow the instructions in the message like an unsubscribe link or similar functionality.
Download your data.
You can make a request in our
Download My Data
tool to export a copy of your Snapchat information.
Object to processing.
Depending on where you live and the particular data we are processing, you may have the right to object to our processing of that information. This gets a bit technical, so we’ve explained it in more detail
here
.
Set advertising preferences.
We try to show you ads that we think will be relevant to your interests, but if you’d like to have a less personalized experience, you can change your advertising settings in the Snapchat app. Learn more
here
.
Tracking.
If you use an iPhone with iOS 14.5 or above, some specific requirements apply, which we’ve specified
here
.
Information We Collect
This section provides you with details on what information we collect: what you provide to us, what we collect when you use Snapchat, and information we receive from other companies or apps you’ve connected to your Snapchat account. Sometimes, we may also collect additional information, with your permission.
When you use our Services, such as Snapchat, we collect information you provide to us, generate information when you use our Services, and in some cases receive data from others. Let’s break these down in more detail.
Information You Provide
Many of our Services require you to set up an account. To do this, we ask you to provide us with
account details
(information about you, like your name, username, email address, birthday, and phone number). When you set up your profile, you’ll also provide us with
profile details
(like your Bitmoji and profile picture). If you use our commerce products to buy something, like those latest sneakers, we may ask you for
payment and related information
(like your physical address, so we can ship the product to you, payment information, so we can process the payment, and transaction history).
Of course, you’ll also provide us with information you send through or save within our Services, including content and information about that content, and content you share and generate with our
AI Features
(content, or “Inputs,” including text, images, video, audio, precise location, and engagement, used to generate content and responses, or “Outputs”). We consider some of this information to be
private content and communications
(like Snaps and Chats with friends, voice and video calls, and content that is saved in My Eyes Only). Or content you share with a particular audience like
private & friend stories
(My Story set to Friends, Private Stories). On the other end of the spectrum, some of the information you send through or save within our Services may be
public content
that is accessible to everyone (such as Public Story content, including My Story set to Everyone, Shared Stories, and Community Stories, Spotlight or Snap Map submissions, and Public Profile information). Keep in mind that Snapchatters who view your Snaps, Chats, and any other content, can always screenshot that content, save it, or copy it outside the Snapchat app. So please don’t send messages or share content that you wouldn’t want someone to save or share.
Lastly, when you
contact Support
(content and communications shared with Support) or our Safety team, or communicate with us in any other way, including through our
research efforts
(like responses to surveys, consumer panels, or other research questions) we’ll collect whatever information you provide or that we need to resolve your question.
Information We Generate When You Use Our Services
When you use our Services, we collect information about which of those Services you’ve used and how you’ve used them. This helps us better understand the way our community uses our Services so that we can make improvements.
This includes
usage information
(information about how you interact with our Services — for example, which Lenses you view and apply, your premium subscriptions, Stories you watch, and how often you interact with other Snapchatters) and
content information
(information about content you create or provide, your engagement with the camera and creative tools, your interactions with My AI, and metadata — for example, information about the content itself like the date and time it was posted and who viewed it).
Content information
includes information based on the content of the image, video, or audio — so if you post a Spotlight of a basketball game, we may use that information to show you more content on Spotlight about basketball.
This also includes
device information
(such as your hardware or software, operating system, device memory, advertising identifiers, apps installed, browser type, information from device sensors that measure the motion of your device or compasses and microphones, including whether you have headphones connected, and information about your wireless and mobile connections),
location information
(IP address),
information collected by cookies and similar technologies
, depending on your settings, (cookies,
pixels
(small graphic data that recognize user activity, such as if and how often a user has visited a website), web storage, unique advertising identifiers), and
log information
(such as details about how you’ve used our Services, access times, pages viewed, IP address, and unique identifiers like cookies).
If you’ve explicitly granted device-level permissions,
device information
may also include information about your
device phonebook
(contacts and related information), images and other information from your device’s
camera, photos, and microphone
(like the ability to take photos, videos, view stored photos and videos, and access the microphone to record audio while recording video), and
location information
(precise location through methods like GPS signals).
Data We Receive From Others
The last category of data we collect is information about you that we may receive from others, such as other users, our
affiliates
, and third parties. This includes
linked third-party service data
(information we get when you link your Snapchat account to another service),
data from advertisers
(information from advertisers, app developers, publishers, and other third parties to help target or measure the performance of ads),
contact info from other Snapchatters or third parties
(if another Snapchatter uploads their contact list which includes your information, we may combine that with other information we have about you to better understand who you may want to communicate with. Or, if you provide us with your contact information, we may use that to determine if we can communicate with you in other ways, like SMS, email, or other messaging services), and
data relating to potential violations of our Terms
(we may receive information from third parties, including website publishers, social network providers, law enforcement, and others, about potential violators of our Terms of Service and Community Guidelines).
Other Information, With Your Permission
Additionally, there may be instances when you interact with our Services that we will ask your permission to collect additional information. For example, before accessing your device’s camera roll or your device or third party contact book.
How We Use Information
This section explains how we use the information we collect. Among other things, we use the information we collect to provide you with personalized products and Services that we work hard to build and improve. Below, we walk through each purpose for which we use information in detail. If you’d like to see a mapping of the data we collect with the purposes for which we collect it, we have a table
here
.
Keep Things Up & Running (i.e., operate, deliver, and maintain our Services)
We use the information we collect in order to operate, deliver, and maintain our Services. For example, by delivering a Snap you want to send to a friend or, if you share your location on Snap Map, to show you suggestions like places you might like in your neighborhood, content others have posted to the Map, or your friends if they’re sharing their location with you. We also use some of your information to help keep our products up to date, for example to make sure that our Services work with the latest operating systems and devices.
Personalize Your Experience & Give Context
We offer personalized Services to Snapchatters. One of the ways we do this is by showing you content that is relevant to you or we think you may enjoy based on the information you share with us. To do so, we use information about you across different areas of the Services in order to add context to your Snapchat experience. For example, we automatically tag content with labels based on the content, your location, or the time of day. So if there's a dog in the photo, it may be searchable in Memories by the term “dog,” show up on the Map at the location where you created the Memory, and inform us that you’re into dogs so we can surface you fun dog videos and dog food ads in other parts of our Services, such as Spotlight.
Personalization can also help with suggesting friends or recommending a new friend to send a Snap to based on who you Snap with the most. We may show recommended places on the Snap Map, generate stickers, or even generate Snaps and other content using AI, infer your interests based on your content or activity, or customize the content we show you, including ads. For example, if you watch barista content on Spotlight, talk to My AI about your favorite espresso machine, or save a lot of coffee-related Snaps in your Memories, we may highlight coffee shops on the Snap Map when you visit a new city or show you content about coffee that you may find interesting or relevant. Or, if you interact with a lot of music venues we may use that to show you ads for upcoming shows in town. Personalization also includes tailoring your experience based on
who you interact with most and
what your friends are doing, including showing you content your friends create, like, or enjoy on Spotlight or Place recommendations that are popular with your friends.
Our goal is to continuously provide you with more relevant and interesting content.
For example, if you watch a lot of sports content, but skip content with hair and makeup tips, our recommendation algorithms will prioritize sports, but not those makeup tips. You can learn more about how we understand Snapchatter preferences and rank and moderate content
here
.
We believe it is critical to also balance the benefits of personalization with our Snapchatters’ expectations of privacy. For example, we may automatically tag the Snaps you save to Memories based on the content within it (e.g., the Snap contained a dog), and then use that tag to personalize your experience, make recommendations, or show you ads (such as showing you Spotlight Snaps containing dogs). We do not use the
private content and communications
you send to your friends to personalize your experience, make recommendations, or show you ads.
Provide Relevant Ads
Another way we provide a personalized Service is through the ads we show. We use your interests and preferences from the information we’ve collected to personalize, target, and measure ads. We think ads are best when they’re relevant. That’s why we try to select the right ads and show them to you at the right time. For example, if you’ve interacted with ads for video games, we will infer that you like video games, and show you similar ads, but those won’t be the only ads you see. Similar to our content strategy, we try to ensure you receive a variety of ads. We also use your information to avoid showing you ads you probably won’t be interested in. For example, if a ticketing site tells us you’ve previously bought tickets for a movie — we can stop showing you ads for it. You can learn about the different types of advertising and your choices about which ads you receive
here
.
You can learn more about how we collect, use, and share your information for advertising purposes
here
.
A note about
information collected by cookies and other technologies
: we may use these technologies to collect information when you interact with Services we offer through one of our partners. For example, we may use information collected on an advertiser’s website to show you more relevant ads. Most web browsers are set to accept cookies by default. If you prefer, you can usually remove or reject browser cookies through the settings on your browser or device. Keep in mind, though, that removing or rejecting cookies could affect the availability and functionality of our Services. To learn more about how we and our partners use cookies on our Services and your choices, please check out our
Cookie Policy
.
Develop & Improve Features, Algorithms & Machine Learning Models
Our teams are constantly coming up with new ideas for features and ways to improve our Services. In order to do this, we also develop and improve the algorithms and
machine learning models
(an expression of an algorithm that combs through significant amounts of data to find patterns or make predictions) that make our features and Services work, including through
generative AI features
(artificial intelligence capable of generating text, images, or other media, using generative models. Generative AI models learn the patterns and structure of their input training data and then generate new data that has similar characteristics). We use algorithms and
machine learning models
for personalization, advertising, safety and security, fairness and inclusivity, augmented reality, and to prevent abuse or other Terms of Service violations. For example, our algorithms and
machine learning models
take into account the conversations Snapchatters are having with My AI to improve the responses from My AI.
Your information can help us decide what kind of improvements we should make, but we are always focused on privacy — and we don’t want to use more of your personal information than necessary to develop our features and models.
Analytics
In order to understand what to build or how to improve our Services, we need to understand trends and demand for our features. For example, we monitor metadata and trends about Group Chat use to help decide whether we should change parts of the feature, like the maximum size of a Group. Studying data from Snapchatters can help us see trends in the ways that people use the Services. This helps inspire us to improve Snapchat on a larger scale. We perform analytics in order to identify, monitor, and analyze trends and usage. Based on this information, we will, among other things, create information about our users to help us understand demand.
Research
We conduct research to better understand general consumer interests, trends, and how our Services are used by you and others in our community. This information, along with analytics (as we described above), helps us understand more about our community and about how our Services fit into the lives of those in our community. We also engage in research and development to develop new techniques and technologies (e.g., new
machine learning models
or hardware, such as Spectacles). The results of our research are sometimes used in features on Snapchat, and we sometimes publish papers about things like overall behaviors and consumer trends (which will only have aggregated data across our user base, and not contain any private information about you specifically).
Enhance the Safety & Security of Our Services
We use your information to enhance the safety and security of our Services, verify Snapchatter identity, and prevent fraud or other unauthorized or illegal activity. For example, we provide two-factor authentication to help protect your account and can send you email or text messages if we notice any suspicious activity. We also scan URLs sent on Snapchat to see if that webpage is potentially harmful, and can give you a warning about it.
Contacting You
Sometimes we’ll get in touch with you to promote new or existing features. This includes sending Snapchatters communications through Snapchat, email, SMS, or other messaging platforms, where permitted. For example, we may use the Snapchat app, email, SMS, or other messaging platforms to share information about our Services and promotional offers that we think may interest you.
Other times, we need to communicate with you to provide information, alerts, or to send messages our users ask us to deliver at their request. This may include sending communications through Snapchat, email, SMS, or other messaging platforms, where permitted, to deliver account status updates, security alerts, and Chat or friending reminders; it may also include fulfilling our user’s request to send invites or Snapchat content to non-Snapchatters.
Support
When you ask for help, we want to get you support as quickly as possible. In order to provide you, the Snapchatter community, and our business partners with the help needed to resolve issues with our Services, we often need to use the information we have collected to respond.
Enforce Our Terms & Policies
We use the data we collect to enforce our Terms and the law. This includes enforcing, investigating, and reporting conduct that violates our Terms, policies, or the law, responding to requests from law enforcement, and complying with legal requirements. For example, when unlawful content is posted on our Services, we may need to enforce our Terms and other policies. In some cases, we may also use or share your information to cooperate with law enforcement requests, escalate safety issues to law enforcement, industry partners, or others, or comply with our legal obligations. Check out our
Transparency Report
to learn more.
Other Purposes, With Your Permission
Additionally, there may be instances when you interact with our Services that we will ask for your permission to use your information in a new, different, or otherwise specific way.
How We Share Information
This section explains who we share information with, what that information may include, and the reasons for sharing that information, including when we need to transfer it outside of the country it was collected from.
Recipients & Reasons for Sharing
Snapchat.
To provide our Services to you and our community, we may share your information with your friends on Snapchat or other Snapchatters. For example, the content you post to Stories, or your status as a premium subscriber, can be viewed by your Friends if you allow them. See the
Control Over Your Information
section and your Settings for the controls you have over who sees what and when.
Family Center Participants.
When you have enabled Family Center, we share information about the connected teen account to the parent or guardian to provide insight about how the account is used, for example, who your Friends are on Snapchat or which friends you may be sharing your location with. We do not share message content.
Learn more
.
Public.
Most of the features on Snapchat are private and for Friends only, but we also offer public features that allow you to opt in to showcase your best Snaps to the world, such as Spotlight, Snap Map, or your Public Profile. When you do this, those Snaps may also be discoverable outside of Snapchat, for example on the web. Some information, like your username and Bitmoji, are visible to the public.
Learn more
.
Third-Party Apps.
Sometimes we provide features that allow you to connect with third-party apps. If you decide to connect your Snapchat account with a third-party app, we will share any additional information you direct us to.
Service Providers.
We share your information with our service providers, who process that information on our behalf. For example, we rely on such Service Providers to facilitate payments, measure and optimize the performance of ads, or protect the services. We do not share private communications with them. We maintain a list of categories of service providers
here
.
Business and Integrated Partners.
We share your information with business and integrated partners in order to provide the Services. For example, you can use OpenTable within Snapchat to reserve a table. This does not include private communications. We maintain a list of these partners
here
.
Anti-Fraud Partners.
We share your information, such as device and usage information, with industry partners working to prevent fraud.
Legal, Safety, and Security Partners.
We share your information as necessary for the following legal, safety, and security reasons:
comply with any valid legal process, governmental request, or applicable law, rule, or regulation.
investigate, remedy, or enforce potential Terms of Service and Community Guidelines violations.
protect the rights, property, or safety of us, our users, or others.
detect and resolve any fraud or security concerns.
Affiliates.
Snap Inc.
consists of different
subsidiaries
owned by us. We may share your information within those internal subsidiaries as needed to carry out our Services.
For the purposes of a Merger or Acquisition.
If we were to sell or negotiate to sell our business to a buyer or possible buyer, we may transfer your information to a successor or affiliate as part of that transaction.
Integrated Partners
Our Services may contain content and integrations offered by our integrated partners. Examples include integrations in Lenses, Camera editing tools, to provide Scan results, and third-party developer integrations. Through these integrations, you may be providing information to the integrated partner as well as to Snap. We are not responsible for how those partners collect or use your information. As always, we encourage you to review the privacy policies of every third-party service that you visit or use, including those third parties you interact with through our Services. You can learn more about our integrations in Snapchat
here
.
On iOS we use Apple’s TrueDepth camera to improve the quality of Lenses. Note, however, that this information is used in real time — we don’t store this information on our servers or share it with third parties.
International Data Transfers
Our Services connect you with your friends around the world. To make that possible, we may collect your personal information from, transfer it to, and store and process it in the United States or other countries outside of where you live. Whenever we share information outside of where you live, we ensure safeguards are in place to protect the data as required by law where you live. If you want to learn more about this, see the
Region Specific Information
section for more details.
How Long We Keep Your Information
In this section we provide you with information on how long we keep your information, why we keep your information, and also highlight how we may need to keep your information to comply with laws, courts, and other obligations.
As a general rule, we keep information as long as you tell us to, and otherwise as long as we need it to provide our Services, or as required by law. For example, if you store something in Memories, we will keep it as long as you need it, but when you Chat with a friend, our systems are designed to delete Chats you send within 24 hours after your friend reads it (
unless you’ve changed your default settings or decide to save it
). Whether we retain your data depends on the specific feature, your settings, and how you’re using the Services. Here are some more factors we consider when we decide how long to keep your information:
If we need the information to operate or provide our Services. For example, we store your basic
account details
— like your name, phone number, and email address — to maintain your account.
To do the things you expect from our Services and as we’ve described within this Privacy Policy. For example, we maintain your list of friends until you ask us to delete them since friends are key to expressing yourself.
Similarly, we keep your shared list of contacts until you ask us to remove them in our app settings (note: updating your device permissions may not remove the contacts you’ve previously shared with Snapchat).
Learn more
.
Conversely, Snaps and Chats sent in Snapchat will be deleted by default from our servers within 24 hours after we detect they’ve been opened by all recipients or have expired, unless you’ve changed your default settings or decide to save something, in which case we will honor your choices.
The information itself. For example, we store location information for different lengths of time based on how precise it is and which Services you use. If location information is associated with a Snap — like those saved to Memories or posted to Snap Map or Spotlight — we’ll retain that location as long as we store the Snap. Pro tip: You can see the location data we retain about you by
downloading your data
.
How long we need to retain the information to comply with certain legal obligations.
If we need it for other legitimate purposes, such as to prevent harm, investigate possible violations of our Terms of Service or other policies, investigate reports of abuse, or protect ourselves or others.
Take a look at our
Privacy by Product
page and
support page
for details on the specific retention periods for products.
Although our systems are designed to delete some of your information automatically, we cannot promise that deletion will take place by a specific time.
In some cases we need to comply with legal requirements to store your data which stops us from deleting your information. For example, if we receive a notice from a court asking us to keep a copy of your content. Other reasons we may keep a copy of your data are if we get reports of abuse or other Terms or policy violations, or if your account, content created by you, or content created with other Snapchatters is flagged by others or our systems for abuse or other Terms or policy violations. Finally, we may also keep certain information in backup for a limited period of time or as required by law.
For the latest information about how long we store different types of content, check out our
Support Site
.
Region Specific Information
Depending on where you live, you may have additional rights, this section provides more details on region specific information.
We do our best to keep our policies as simple as possible, but depending on where you live, you have some additional rights or there may be specific information that you should be aware of. Please take a look at the list below to see if any apply to you!
Australia
Brazil
Canada
Europe
Mexico
South Korea
Turkey
United States
Note:
The U.S. State Privacy Notice applies only if you are a resident of certain U.S. states that have implemented state-level privacy laws.
Some jurisdictions require that we state our legal basis for processing data for particular purposes. You can find that information
here
.
Our Audience
Our Services are directed to individuals 13 years and older.
Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and you must confirm that you are 13 years or older in order to create an account and use our Services. If we have actual knowledge that you are under the age of 13 (or the minimum age at which a person may use the Services in your state, province, or country without parental consent, if greater), we will stop providing Services to you and delete your account and data.
In addition, we may also limit how we collect, use, and store some of the information of Snapchatters under 18. In some cases, this means we will be unable to provide certain functionality to people under the age of 18.
Updates to the Privacy Policy
We may update our Privacy Policy from time to time, and will give you a heads up if we make any changes we think you should know about.
We may change this Privacy Policy from time to time. But when we do, we’ll let you know one way or another. Sometimes, we’ll let you know by revising the date at the top of the Privacy Policy that’s available on our website and mobile application. Other times, we may provide you with additional notice (such as adding a statement to our websites’ homepages or providing you with an in-app notification).
Contact Us
Have any questions about the information here
or wish to contact our Data Protection Officer (DPO)
? You can contact us
here
.
Sub-policy 2
https://www.tiktok.com/legal/privacy-policy:
EEA/UK/CH
Privacy Policy
Effective Date:
04 December 2024
Introduction
This privacy policy ("
Privacy Policy
") applies to the personal information that TikTok processes in connection with TikTok apps, websites, software and related services (the “
Platform
”), that link to or reference this Privacy Policy.
Data Controller
: If you live in the European Economic Area (“
EEA
”), the United Kingdom (“
UK
”), or Switzerland, TikTok Technology Limited, an Irish company (“
TikTok Ireland
”), and TikTok Information Technologies UK Limited (“
TikTok UK
”), a UK company, ("
TikTok
," "
our
," "
we
," or "
us
") are the joint controllers of your information processed in connection with this Privacy Policy.
What Information We Collect
We collect your information in three ways:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
. More detail is provided below.
Information You Provide
Account Information.
We collect information that you provide when you set up an account, such as your date of birth, username, email address and/or telephone number, and password. You can choose to add other information to your account, such as a bio or image.
User Content.
We collect the content you create, import, upload or publish through the Platform, such as photographs, videos, audio recordings, livestreams, comments, hashtags, feedback, reviews, and the associated metadata (such as when, where, and by whom the content was created). Even if you are not a user, information about you may appear in content created or published by users on the Platform. We collect
User Content
through pre-loading at the time of creation, import, or upload, regardless of whether you choose to save or upload that
User Content
, for example, to recommend music based on the video. We also collect content (such as text, images, and video) from your device's clipboard if you choose to copy and paste content to or from the Platform or share content between it and a third party platform. In addition, we collect location information (such as tourist attractions, shops, or other points of interest) if you choose to add the location information to your
User Content
.
Messages.
We collect the content of the messages you send and receive on the Platform and the associated metadata (such as the time the message was sent, received or read, as well as the participants in the communication). We also collect the messages you send or receive through our chat functionality when using our shopping feature to communicate with sellers or using virtual assistants.
Your Contacts and Other Connections.
If you choose to sync your contacts, we will collect information from your device’s phone book such as names, phone numbers, and email addresses, and match that information to users of the Platform. If you choose to find other users through your social network contacts, we will collect your public profile information as well as names and profiles of your social network contacts. We also collect information about the accounts you follow and that follow you.
Purchase Information.
When you make a purchase, a payment, or other transaction on or through the Platform, including when you buy TikTok Coins or purchase products through our shopping features, we collect information about the transaction, such as payment card information, billing, delivery, and contact information, and products you purchased.
Surveys, Research, and Promotions.
We collect
Information You Provide
if you choose to participate in a survey, research, promotion, contest, marketing campaign, or event conducted or sponsored by us.
Information When You Contact Us.
When you contact us, we collect the information you send us, such as proof of identity or age, feedback or inquiries about your use of the Platform or information about possible violations of our
Terms of Service
(our “
Terms
”),
Community Guidelines
(our “
Guidelines
”), or other policies.
Information From Forms and Features You Use
. We collect the
Information You Provide
when you fill in a form on the Platform. You can let TikTok fill in forms automatically with your account info, like your addresses or payment info.
Automatically Collected Information
Technical Information.
We collect certain device and network connection information when you access the Platform. This information includes your device model, operating system, keystroke patterns or rhythms, IP address, system language and device settings. We also collect service-related, diagnostic, performance information, including crash reports and performance logs. We automatically assign you a device ID and user ID. Where you log-in from multiple devices, we use information such as your device ID and user ID to identify your activity across devices to give you a seamless log-in experience and for security purposes.
Location Information.
We automatically collect information about your approximate location (e.g. country, state, or city) based on your
Technical Information
(such as SIM card and IP address). Also, where you enable location services for the TikTok app within your device settings, we collect approximate location information from your device. Click
here
to learn more about how we collect Location Information.
Usage Information.
We collect information about how you engage with the Platform, including information about how you interact with content and ads, the duration and frequency of your use, your engagement with other users, and your search history.
Content Characteristics and Features.
We detect and collect characteristics and features about the videos, images, and audio recordings that are part of your
User Content
, for example, by identifying objects and scenery, the existence or location within an image of a face or other body parts; and the text of words spoken in your
User Content
. We do this, for example, for content moderation and to provide special effects (such as video filters and avatars) and captions.
Inferred Information.
We infer your attributes (such as age-range and gender) and interests based on the information we have about you. We use inferences, for example, to keep the Platform safe (such as for content moderation), to show you relevant information, and, where permitted, to serve you personalised ads based on your interests.
Cookies.
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to operate and provide the Platform. For example, we use cookies to remember your language preferences, make sure you don’t see the same video more than once, and for security purposes. We also use these technologies for marketing purposes. To learn more about our use of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
. We will obtain your consent to our use of cookies where required by law.
Information From Other Sources
Advertising, Measurement and Other Partners.
Advertisers, measurement and other partners share information with us about you and the actions you have taken outside of the Platform, such as your activities on other websites and apps or in stores, including the products or services you purchased, online or in person. These partners also share information with us, such as mobile identifiers for advertising, hashed email addresses and phone numbers, and cookie identifiers, which we use to help match you and your actions outside of the Platform with your TikTok account. Some of our advertisers and other partners enable us to collect similar information directly from their website or app by integrating our
TikTok Advertiser Tools
(such as TikTok Pixel). These partners are required to have the necessary rights and permissions to share your information with us before doing so. We process certain information that we receive from these partners as a joint controller with them.
Learn more
about our arrangements with these partners.
Sellers, Payment and Transaction Fulfillment Providers.
We receive information about you from sellers as well as payment and transaction fulfillment providers, such as payment confirmation details, and information about the delivery of products you have purchased through our shopping features.
Third Party Platforms and Partners.
Third party platforms provide us with information (such as your email address, authentication ID, and public profile) when you choose to sign up for or log in to the Platform using sign-in features provided by those third parties. We may also receive contact information that you hold or is held about you when contact information is synced with our Platform by you or another user. When you interact with any third party service (such as third party apps, websites or products) that integrate
TikTok Developer Tools
, we will receive the information necessary to provide you with features like cross-service authentication or cross-posting. For example, this will happen if you log in to another platform with your TikTok account or if you use TikTok’s “share” button on a third party platform to share content from there to the Platform. We may also receive information from third party providers which we use for safety purposes, including to protect users on the Platform and for content moderation.
Additional Sources.
We may collect or receive information about you from organisations, businesses, people, and others, including, for example, publicly available sources, government authorities, professional organisations, and charity groups. We also collect information about you where you are included or mentioned in
User Content
,
Messages
, in a complaint, appeal, request or feedback submitted by a user or third party, or if your contact information is provided to us by a user.
How We Use Your Information
We use your information to operate, provide, develop, and improve the Platform, including for the following purposes. You can find more detail in “
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
”.
Provide and administer the Platform, such as enabling you to create, share, and consume content, to interact with other users and their content, and provide user support.
Provide our shopping features (such as personalised shopping benefits) and facilitate the purchase and delivery of products, goods and services, including sharing your information with sellers, payment and transaction fulfilment providers, and other service providers in order to process your orders.
Personalise and customise certain features and content such as providing your “For You” feed and content creation tools.
Enforce our Terms, Guidelines, and other policies that apply to you. We review
User Content
and other information through a mix of technology (including through automated means) and human moderation to protect the safety and well-being of our community.
Provide certain interactive features, such as enabling your content to be used in other users’ videos,
Suggest your account to other users and suggest accounts of others to you to help connect you with other users.
Provide and improve our advertising services, including to serve ads (including personalised ads, where permitted).
Create analytics reports so that partners, sellers and creators can see how their content, ads or products are performing and to better understand their audience and buyers.
Maintain and enhance the safety, security, and stability of the Platform by identifying and addressing technical or security issues or problems (such as technical bugs, spam accounts, and detecting abuse, fraud, and illegal activity).
Review, improve, and develop the Platform, including by monitoring interactions and usage across your devices, analysing how people are using it, and by training, testing, and improving our technology, such as our machine learning models and algorithms.
Share your information with third party platforms to provide you with features, like content sharing at your request when you integrate your TikTok account with a third party service.
Facilitate research conducted by independent researchers that meets certain criteria.
Promote the Platform or third party services through marketing communications, contests, or promotions.
Facilitate the sending of marketing communications by sellers to you on our Platform. We act as a joint controller with the sellers in this scenario.
Learn more
about our arrangements with these sellers.
Comply with our legal obligations, or as necessary to perform tasks in the public interest, or to protect the vital interests of our users and other people.
Protect the Platform and defend our legal rights and commercial interests, and those of our affiliates, users and the public.
How We Share Your Information
Service Providers
We engage service providers that help us provide, support, and develop the Platform and understand how it is used. They provide services such as: cloud hosting, and content delivery, customer and technical support, content moderation, marketing, analytics, and online payments.
We share
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
with these service providers as necessary to enable them to provide their services.
Partners
Third Party Platforms and Partners.
We share limited information which may include
Information You Provide
,
Technical Information
, and
Usage Information
with third party platforms and partners whose platform or services are integrated with the Platform, or with whom we have a commercial relationship. We do this to give you a seamless experience, allow your content to be shared on other platforms, allow sellers to view and manage your orders through our shopping features, and enable third party platforms and partners to better authenticate users. Some examples include if you:
log-in to a third party platform using your account, we will share your basic account information and any other
Information You Provide
,
sign-up or log-in to the Platform using your account details from a third party platform (such as Facebook or Google), we will share certain
Technical Information
to facilitate this,
share
User Content
you publish on the Platform on other social media platforms, we will share your
User Content
and related information.
Advertisers.
We provide advertisers with reports about the performance of their ads and other content on the Platform in order to help them measure their effectiveness and understand their audience. These reports contain aggregate information of certain
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
. We don’t share information with advertisers that can be used to contact you (such as your name or email address) unless you give us your permission.
Measurement and Data Partners.
We share
Information You Provide
,
Technical Information
and
Usage Information
with third party measurement providers who create aggregate reports that help us measure advertising served on the Platform and help our advertisers understand their effectiveness and their audience.
Sellers and their Service Providers.
When you make a purchase through the shopping features on our Platform, we share
Purchase Information
related to the transaction with the sellers and service providers acting on their behalf. This includes order items, contact details and delivery information so that your order can be processed. We also share certain
Technical Information
about your device or connection with these parties to help ensure the security of the transaction. When making a purchase through our shopping features, please review the product and seller location details provided on the Platform for information about where your information will be sent.
Users of Our Analytics Services.
We provide aggregated statistics and insights to help people and businesses understand how people are engaging with the Platform. For example, creators, advertisers and sellers can receive information about the number of views, likes, comments and shares of their content, as well as information to understand their followers, buyers and the audience of their content. We create this aggregate information using
Information you Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
. In certain circumstances, TikTok is a joint controller with TikTok account holders for this processing.
Learn more
about the joint processing for TikTok Analytics.
Our Corporate Group
As a global company, the Platform is supported by certain entities within our corporate group (“
Corporate Group
”). These entities process
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
for us, as necessary to provide certain functions, such as storage, content delivery, security, research and development, analytics, online payments, customer and technical support, and content moderation. See
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
for additional information.
Others
We share your information in other limited scenarios as follows:
Users and the Public.
Based on your privacy settings, your information, including your
Account Information
,
User Content
, and
Usage Information
may be visible to other users and the public. For example, if you have a public account and have not restricted the visibility of your posts individually, your
Account Information
and
User Content
can be viewed or shared by anyone on or off the Platform, whether or not they have a TikTok account. Depending on your privacy settings, your
Account Information
and
User Content
may also appear on search engines, content aggregators, and news sites. You can learn about account types and privacy settings, including how to limit the audience for your videos
here
.
Independent Researchers:
We share your information with independent researchers to facilitate research that meets certain criteria as described in
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
.
Corporate Transactions.
Your information may be disclosed to third parties in connection with a corporate transaction, such as a merger, sale of assets or shares, reorganisation, financing, change of control, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business.
Legal Obligations and Rights.
We may access, preserve, and share the information described in "
What Information We Collect
" with law enforcement agencies, public authorities, researchers, copyright holders, or other third parties if we have good faith belief that it is necessary to:
comply with applicable law, legal process or government requests, as consistent with internationally recognised standards,
protect the rights, property, and safety of our users, copyright holders, and others, including to protect life or prevent imminent bodily harm. For example, we may provide information (such as your IP address) to law enforcement in the event of an emergency where someone’s life or safety is at risk,
investigate potential violations of and enforce our Terms, Guidelines, or any other applicable terms, policies, or standards, or
detect, investigate, prevent, or address misleading activity, copyright infringement, or other illegal activity.
To learn more about how we handle requests from law enforcement agencies and public authorities, see our
Law Enforcement Guidelines
.
Our Legal Bases and How We Process Your Information
We may only use your information when we have a “legal basis” to do so. We use different legal bases depending on why we use your information (in other words, the “purpose” of our processing). These legal bases are contractual necessity, legitimate interests (ours, yours or those of another party), consent, compliance with a legal obligation, performing a task in the public interest, and protection of vital interests.
Here we explain the legal bases we rely on when we process your information. This section also describes why we use your information, how this information is processed, the categories of information involved, and the associated rights (which always includes the right to access your information). For more information on how to exercise any of your rights, please check out the “
Your Rights and Choices
” section in the Privacy Policy.
Contractual Necessity
If you have the legal capacity to enter into an enforceable contract, we use
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
where it is necessary to perform the contract you enter into (our Terms) when you register for, access, or use the Platform. This means we use your information to:
Provide you with the Platform.
We use your information to allow you to access and use the Platform, including allowing you to create, share and consume content, interact with others, utilise social features, and provide you with products and services you purchase.
Personalise features and content.
We also personalise certain features and content such as providing your “For You” feed, which shows you videos that we think you would be interested in (see
here
for more information) and by suggesting accounts to you.
Product orders and deliveries.
We use your information to process orders, such as to facilitate the purchase and delivery of products, and communicate with you about your orders. This includes sharing
Purchase Information
with Sellers, Payment and Transaction Fulfilment Providers, and Other Service Providers
Enforce our Terms, Guidelines, or policies.
We use your information to enforce our Terms, Guidelines, and policies (including through automated means and human moderation). This may include age restricting or removing content, maintaining our For You feed eligibility standards, or suspending or banning your account if we determine that you are violating our Terms or Guidelines.
Administer the Platform.
We also use the information we have to administer the Platform, such as to communicate with you on service related matters, provide you with updates and support regarding any purchase you make on or through the Platform, and respond to and process your queries, claims or disputes (including when you tell us about a problem, or ask for a copy of your information).
Your Rights
: Whenever we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for the contract we have with you, you have the right to port information you have provided to us.
Legitimate Interests
We use your information where this is necessary to achieve legitimate interests - whether belonging to us, you, or a third party - provided these interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. We use the information we collect to:
Enable users to create content with interactive features
.
Interactive features, like Duet and Stitch, enable other users to include your videos in their videos (if you allow this in your settings).
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To provide users with tools to inspire creativity, collaboration, and enjoyment, and to create opportunities for users to reach new audiences.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Suggest your account to other users
.
We may suggest your account to other users, including when a user chooses to sync their contacts with the Platform.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To enable users to quickly and efficiently find and connect with other users.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Provide all users with generic advertising
.
We show all users generic ads, including those who have chosen not to receive personalised ads.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: We show generic ads to keep the Platform free of charge. We process limited categories of your information to make sure our advertising service is useful to our advertisers (for example, to serve ads to users in a particular country or to users who speak the same language).
Information used
:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Provide measurement and analytics services
.
We help creators, sellers and advertisers measure the effectiveness and distribution of ads and other content viewed on the Platform.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To enable creators, sellers and advertisers to view and understand how their ads or content performed and the audience that viewed or interacted with their ads or content. This is so that they can make informed decisions (such as what kinds of ad campaigns they may want to run, the type of audience they want to reach and the types of content that users enjoy the most). This helps keep the advertising and other content we show users relevant and entertaining, and keeps the Platform free for all users.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Ensure the safety and well-being of our community
.
We use your information to ensure the safety and well-being of our community, including by reviewing
User Content
(and if permitted under applicable law,
Messages
and associated metadata) for breaches of our Terms, Guidelines, and other policies. We also infer your age range, and under certain circumstances, may ask you to provide additional information to confirm your age.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To keep our community safe, review compliance with our Guidelines, and identify misuse of the Platform.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Ensure the security and stability of the Platform
.
We use your information to ensure the stability and security of the Platform, including by identifying and combating technical or security issues (such as technical bugs, spam accounts, and detecting abuse, fraud, and illegal activity).
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To ensure the ongoing stability and security of the Platform and to ensure it is continuously available and functioning.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Review, improve, promote, and develop the Platform
.
We use the information we have to understand how people are using the Platform and to develop, test, and make improvements to the Platform, including to develop and improve our technology, such as our machine learning models and algorithms. We also use this information to better understand and promote the Platform, popular topics, and emerging trends, and offer certain personalised features. We also review messages you exchange with customer support to improve technologies supporting such functions.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To improve, promote, and develop the Platform in an informed way.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Facilitate independent research.
We share your information with independent researchers to facilitate research that meets certain criteria, including where such researchers have demonstrable experience and expertise in their area. Click
here
to learn more
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To facilitate independent research that aims to develop society’s collective knowledge, including in the areas of misinformation and disinformation, violence, cybercrime, and social trends.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Share your information with third parties
.
We share your information with third parties whose platforms or services are integrated with, or otherwise made available on, the Platform.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To optimise your experience, allow your content to be shared on other platforms, enable third parties to authenticate users, and to allow for the performance of commercial agreements.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Protect the Platform and defend legal rights
We may use your information in connection with preparing for, taking and defending actual or anticipated legal claims or proceedings (including investigating any potential claims we may have or be aware of).
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: to protect the Platform and defend the legal rights and commercial interests of us, our affiliates, our users and the public.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Marketing communications
.
We may send you marketing messages about the Platform and third party products and services where we think they will interest you. Where required, we will obtain your consent to send you such communications.
Legitimate Interest relied upon
: To promote the Platform and third party products and services.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Your Rights
: Whenever we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for legitimate interests, you can object to, and request restriction of, such usage.
If you are under the age of majority (under 18 in most relevant countries), with a limited ability to enter into an enforceable contract only, where we may be unable to process your information on the grounds of contractual necessity, we rely on legitimate interests and use the information we collect to:
Provide you with the Platform
We use your information to allow you to access and use the Platform, including allowing you to create, share, and consume content, interact with others, utilise features, and provide you with products and services you purchase.
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To provide, support, and maintain products and features that enable users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us to communicate, discover, and engage with content and express themselves. We also rely on the legitimate interest of our users in being able to access the Platform in an easy and intuitive manner..
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Personalise features and content
We use your information to personalise
certain
features and content
on the Platform, such as providing your “For You” feed, which shows you videos that we think you would be interested in (see
here
for more information) and by suggesting accounts to you.
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To provide, support, and maintain products and features that enable users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us to communicate, discover, create and engage with content and users relevant to their interests. We also rely on the legitimate interest of our users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us in being able to access the Platform and content relevant to their interests.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Enforce our Terms, Guidelines, or policies.
We use your information to enforce our Terms, Guidelines, and policies (including through automated means and human moderation). This may include age restricting or removing content, maintaining our For You feed eligibility standards, or suspending or banning your account if we determine that you are violating our Terms or Guidelines.
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To keep the Platform free of harmful or inappropriate content, to investigate suspicious activity or breaches of our Terms, Guidelines, or policies and to protect the safety of users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us, including to prevent exploitation or other harm to which such individuals may be particularly vulnerable. It is also in the legitimate interests of our users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us, and the public at large, to prevent bad experiences and promote safety, integrity and security.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Administer the Platform.
We use the information we have to administer the Platform, such as to communicate with users and respond to and process queries, claims or disputes (including when you tell us about a problem, or ask for a copy of your information).
Legitimate Interests relied upon
: To share meaningful updates with our users who can’t enter into an enforceable contract with us about service-related matters, and process their queries, claims and disputes.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Your Rights
: Whenever we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for legitimate interests, you can object to, and request restriction of, such usage.
Your Consent
We ask for your consent to access or use your information for specific purposes. If we do, you’ll always be able to revoke your consent through your device permissions or in-app settings.
Personalised advertising
.
With your consent, we serve you with personalised ads based on your activity on and off the Platform. Click
here
to learn more.
Information used
:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
for this purpose.
Retain your payment card information.
With your consent, we store your payment card information to facilitate future transactions through our Platform.
Information used:
Information You Provide
Sellers’ marketing communications.
With your consent, we facilitate the sending of marketing communications to you by sellers on our Platform and/or share your email address with sellers for the purpose of sending marketing communications to you.
Information used:
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
.
Device permissions.
We collect information that you allow us to receive through your device-based settings (such as access to your camera, photos and location services) which we use for subsequent purposes as described in this Privacy Policy.
Information used:
Information You Provide
,
Automatically Collected Information
, and
Information From Other Sources
.
Your rights
: Whenever we use your information based on your consent, you can withdraw your consent at any time. However, your withdrawal of consent will not affect the lawfulness of processing your information based on your consent prior to your withdrawal of consent. You can withdraw your consent for applicable personalised ads related settings by following these
instructions
.
You also have the right to port information you have provided to us that we use based on your consent.
Compliance with a legal obligation
We may use your information including your
Account Information
or
User Content
where it is necessary to comply with a legal obligation. This includes situations where we have obligations to communicate with you, take measures to ensure the safety of our users, or comply with a valid legal request such as an order or disclosure request from regulators, law enforcement agencies or courts. We generally use
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
, although it depends on the specific situation.
To perform a task in the public interest
We may use your information where it is necessary to perform a task in the public interest, including undertaking research, preventing and detecting crime, safeguarding children and promoting public safety, security, and integrity as laid down by applicable law. We generally use
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
, although it depends on the specific situation.
Your rights
: When we use your information on the basis that it is necessary for a task carried out in the public interest, you have the right to object to, and seek restriction of, our usage.
To protect someone's vital interests
We may use your information where it is necessary to protect your or someone else's life, physical integrity, or safety. This could include providing law enforcement agencies or emergency services with information in urgent situations to protect health or life. We generally provide
Information You Provide
and
Automatically Collected Information
, although it depends on the specific situation.
Your Rights and Choices
You have rights and choices when it comes to your information. Some of these rights apply generally, while others will only apply in certain circumstances. Depending on the scenario, these rights may be subject to some limitations. TikTok Ireland will be responsible for responding to your request within the relevant periods provided by law. If necessary to resolve your request, TikTok Ireland will liaise with TikTok UK.
Access your information.
You can ask us, free of charge, to confirm what information we process about you, to provide certain information about the processing, and for a copy of your information. In-app controls enable you to:
access your information that is available to other users when you navigate to the "
me
" tab on your account.
request a copy of your information by using the “
Download your data
” tool. Click
here
for detailed instructions.
Delete your information.
You can delete or ask us to delete your information. In-app controls enable you to:
delete the content posted on your account, such as your
User Content
and your
Account Information
.
delete your full account. Click
here
for detailed instructions.
request the deletion of a particular piece of content using the in-app reporting feature (more information is available
here
).
Rectify your information.
You can change or ask us to change or correct your information where that information is not accurate. You can change or correct much of your information through the in-app controls and settings (such as your
Account Information
and video content).
Port your information.
You have the right to data portability in circumstances where we rely on contractual necessity or consent as our legal basis. This means that you have the right to receive your information in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and to share it with a third party. You can exercise your right of portability by choosing to “
Download your data
” in your settings. Click
here
for detailed instructions. You can also port your TikTok data through TikTok’s Data Portability API. Click
here
for further information.
Object to the processing of your information
. You also have the
right to object
to the processing of your information in certain circumstances. This right applies when we are performing a task in the public interest, pursuing our legitimate interests or those of a third party, or when your data is processed for the purpose of facilitating scientific or historical research in certain circumstances. In submitting an objection request, please provide all relevant information, including the processing activity you are objecting to, why you want to object and how the processing activity affects you, and any additional information that you think will help us review your request. We will stop the particular processing if we don't have compelling legitimate grounds to continue that processing or don’t need it for legal claims.
Restrict the processing of your information
. You have the right to request the restriction of the processing of your information where (a) you are challenging the accuracy of the information, (b) the information has been unlawfully processed, but you are opposing the deletion of that information, (c) where you need the information to be retained for the pursuit or defence of a legal claim, or (d) you have objected to processing and you are awaiting the outcome of that objection request.
To exercise any of the above rights, please contact us through our
webform
. Before we can respond to a request to exercise one or more of the rights listed above, you may be required to verify your identity or your account details or provide additional information so that we can understand your request.
We encourage you to “
Contact us
” if you are not satisfied with how we have responded to any of your rights requests. You also have the right to lodge a complaint with the Irish Data Protection Commission (TikTok Ireland’s lead supervisory authority) or with your local supervisory authority.
In addition to these rights, you can control privacy settings for your account. Click
here
for more information.
Your choice regarding the use of information across different services.
If you are a user in the EU, we offer you the choice of whether to combine and cross-use your TikTok activity data with our affiliated services, like TikTok Shop, where legally required.
Learn more
.
Data Security and Retention
Security of your information is important to us. We maintain appropriate technical, administrative, and physical security measures that are designed to protect your information from unauthorised access, theft, disclosure, modification, or loss. We regularly review our security measures to consider available new technology and methods.
We retain information for as long as necessary to provide the Platform and for the other purposes set out in this Privacy Policy. We also retain information when necessary to comply with contractual and legal obligations, when we have a legitimate business interest to do so (such as improving and developing the Platform, and enhancing its safety, security and stability), and for the exercise or defence of legal claims.
The retention periods will be different depending on the type of information and the purposes for which we use the information. For example, when we process your information to provide you with the Platform, we keep this information for as long as you have an account. This information includes your
Account Information
,
User Content
, and
Messages
. If you violate our Guidelines or Terms, we may remove
Information You Provide
including your
Account Information
and/or
User Content
from public view immediately but keep your information as is necessary to process the violation.
Our Global Operations and Data Transfers
To support our global operations:
We store the information described in the “
What Information We Collect
” section in servers located in the United States, Malaysia and Singapore.
Certain entities in our Corporate Group, located outside your country of residence (see
here
), are given limited remote access to this information so they can provide certain functions, as described in the Our Corporate Group section in “
How We Share Your Information
”. This access is limited, secure and only granted where necessary under strict security controls and authorisation approval protocols.
We share “
What Information We Collect
” with service providers, partners and other third party entities, as described in “
How We Share Your Information
”. These third parties can be located outside your country of residence.
These entities commit to processing information in compliance with applicable privacy laws and to implementing appropriate security measures to protect your information.
When we transfer your information outside of the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, we ensure it benefits from an adequate level of data protection by relying on:
Adequacy decisions. These are decisions from the
European Commission
under Article 45 GDPR (or equivalent decisions under other laws) where they recognise that a country offers an adequate level of data protection. We transfer your information as described in “
What Information We Collect
” to some countries with adequacy decisions, such as the countries listed
here
; or
Article 49. In the absence of an adequacy decision, We rely on Article 49 (1)(b) and (c) GDPR to transfer Purchase Information as described in “
What Information We Collect
” to sellers and transaction fulfilment providers in countries without an adequacy decision when necessary to provide shopping features to facilitate the purchase and delivery of products, goods and services, or to process your orders; or
Standard contractual clauses. The European Commission has approved
contractual clauses
under Article 46 of the GDPR that allows companies in the EEA to transfer data outside the EEA. These (and their approved equivalent for the UK and Switzerland) are called standard contractual clauses. We rely on standard contractual clauses to transfer information as described in “
What Information We Collect
” to certain entities in our Corporate Group (as described
here
)
and third parties in countries without an adequacy decision.
For a copy of these adequacy decisions or standard contractual clauses, please contact us via the details provided in the “
Contact us
” section below.
Younger Users
You must be at least 13 years old to use the Platform. If you believe that there is a user who is below this minimum age, please contact us using this
webform
.
To provide users younger than 18 with an age-appropriate experience, certain features are not available. Further details are available in our
Help Centre
.
If you are the guardian of a teen, our
Guardian's Guide
contains information and resources to help you understand the Platform and the tools and controls you or your teen can use, including “Family Pairing” features.
Privacy Policy Updates
We may amend or update this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will notify you of any material changes to this policy by a notice provided through the Platform or by other means. The “Last Updated” date at the top of this policy reflects the effective date of such policy changes.
Contact Us
You can contact us about this Privacy Policy through our
webform
. You can reach TikTok's Data Protection Officer
here
.
You can also contact us at the following postal address.
For users in the European Economic Area and Switzerland
: TikTok Technology Limited, The Sorting Office, Ropemaker Place, Dublin 2, Dublin, D02 HD23, Ireland.
For users in the United Kingdom
: TikTok Information Technologies UK Limited, Kaleidoscope, 4 Lindsey Street, London, EC1A 9HP, United Kingdom.
Sub-policy 3
https://advertising.amazon.com/legal/privacy-notice:
Privacy Notice
Select your country to see the Privacy Notice
North America
Canada
Mexico
United States
Europe
Belgium
France
Germany
Italy
Netherlands
Poland
Spain
Sweden
Turkey
United Kingdom
Asia Pacific
Australia
India
Japan
Singapore
Middle East
Egypt
Saudi Arabia
United Arab Emirates
South America
Brazil
On this site, we use cookies and similar tools (collectively, "cookies") to provide and improve services to you and to show ads. To learn more about how Amazon Ads uses cookies, please read the
Amazon Cookies Notice.
Continue without accepting
Accept all cookies
Sub-policy 4
https://privacy.kisa.or.kr/:
본문내용 바로가기
주메뉴로 바로가기
풋터 바로가기
+ 대국민서비스 바로가기
대표웹사이트
이용안내
신고센터
이용방법
처리절차
타 신고기관 안내
신고·상담
침해 신고·상담 방법
신고·상담 하기
신고 처리상태 확인
기업·공공기관
기술지원
개인정보유출 신고
알림마당
공지사항
이용안내
신고센터
이용방법
처리절차
타 신고기관 안내
신고·상담
침해 신고·상담 방법
신고·상담 하기
신고 처리상태 확인
기업·공공기관
기술지원
개인정보유출 신고
알림마당
공지사항
모바일메뉴닫기
※인증시간이 10분 남았습니다.
개인정보침해 신고·상담
만 14세 미만
신고·상담 신청
만 14세 이상
신고·상담 신청
나의 신고
처리상태 확인
개인정보 바로알기
개인정보보호 온라인 교육
개인정보 열람 요구
개인정보처리방침
찾아오시는 길
고객광장
RSS
전자우편무단수집거부
전자우편 무단수집 거부
본 웹사이트에 게시된 전자우편 주소가
전자우편수집 프로그램
이나 그 밖의 기술적 장치를 이용하여 무단으로 수집되는 것을 거부하며, 이를 위반시
정보통신망 이용촉진 및 정보보호 등에 관힌 법률에 의해 처벌
받을 수 있습니다.
확인
전자우편 무단수집 거부
본 웹사이트에 게시된 전자우편 주소가
전자우편수집 프로그램
이나 그 밖의 기술적 장치를 이용하여 무단으로 수집되는 것을 거부하며, 이를 위반시
정보통신망 이용촉진 및 정보보호 등에 관힌 법률에 의해 처벌
받을 수 있습니다.
확인
[나주본원]  58342 전남 나주시 진흥길 9(빛가람동) 한국인터넷진흥원 개인정보침해 신고센터
TEL. 118  /  FAX. 061-820-2619
© 2019 KISA. All rights reserved.
웹접근성 인증 마크